src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-sanymash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - шанымаш: # Noun 'a thought'
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom: шанымаш
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Gen: шанымашын
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Acc: шанымашым
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Com: шанымашге
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Dat: шанымашлан
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Ine: [шанымашты, шанымашышты]
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Ill: [шанымашыш, шанымашкы, шанымашышкы]
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Lat: шанымашеш
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr: шанымашлз
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Abe: шанымашде

     шанымаш+N+Pl+Nom: шанымашвлӓ

     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: шанымашем
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: шанымашет
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: шанымашыжы
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/PC: шанымашна
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/PC: шанымашда
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC: шанымашышты
